Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB135.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102.1(a), (b), (c)(1) and (d) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1102.1. Sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer.(a) First degree murder.--[A] Except as provided under subsection (a.1), a person who has been convicted after June 24, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 2012, of a murder of the first degree[,] or first degree murder of an unborn child [or murder of a law enforcement officer of the first degree] and who was under the age of 18 at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was 15 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment [without parole, or a term of imprisonment], the minimum of which shall be [at least] 35 years to life.(2) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was under 15 years of age shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment [without parole, or a term of imprisonment], the minimum of which shall be [at least] 25 years to life.(a.1) Law enforcement officers.--A person who has been convicted of a murder of a law enforcement officer of the first degree and who was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was 15 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment without parole, or a term of imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be at least 35 years and the maximum of which shall be life imprisonment.(2) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was under 15 years of age shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment without parole, or a term of imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be at least 25 years and the maximum of which shall be life imprisonment.(b) Notice.--Reasonable notice to the defendant of the Commonwealth's intention to seek a sentence of life imprisonment 20250SB0135PN0135 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without parole under subsection (a) or (a.1) shall be provided after conviction and before sentencing.(c) Second degree murder.--A person who has been convicted after June 24, 2012, of a murder of the second degree, second degree murder of an unborn child or murder of a law enforcement officer of the second degree and who was under the age of 18 at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced as follows:(1) A person who at the time of the commission of the offense was [15] 25 years of age or older shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment the minimum of which shall be at least 30 years to life.* * *(d) Findings.--In determining whether to impose a sentence of life without parole under subsection (a) or (a.1), the court shall consider and make findings on the record regarding the following:* * *Section 2. Section 9714(a)(2) of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.(a) Mandatory sentence.--* * *(2) Where the person had at the time of the commission of the current offense previously been convicted of two or more such crimes of violence arising from separate criminal transactions, the person shall be sentenced to a minimum sentence of at least 25 years of total confinement, notwithstanding any other provision of this title or other statute to the contrary. Proof that the offender received 20250SB0135PN0135 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice of or otherwise knew or should have known of the penalties under this paragraph shall not be required. Upon conviction for a third or subsequent crime of violence the court may[, if it determines that 25 years of total confinement is insufficient to protect the public safety,] sentence the offender to a minimum sentence of at least 20 years of total confinement and a maximum sentence of life imprisonment [without parole].* * *Section 3. Title 61 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5912. Life with Parole Reinvestment Fund. (a) Establishment.--The Life with Parole Reinvestment Fund is established as a separate fund within the State Treasury to provide funding for all of the following:(1) Victim services.(2) Offender reentry programs.(3) The supervision of certain paroled offenders.(b) Savings assessment.--In fiscal years 2025-2026 through 2028-2029, the Office of the Budget shall develop a formula to calculate the amount of savings to the department in the prior fiscal year as a result of the reduction in prison population because of the paroling of offenders previously incarcerated for life without parole under section 6137(a)(3)(ii) and (iii) (relating to parole power).(c) Appropriations.--In fiscal year 2025-2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of savings calculated under subsection (b) are appropriated to the fund.(d) Transfers.--In fiscal year 2026-2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the money in the fund shall be transferred as follows:20250SB0135PN0135 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Twenty-five percent to the Office of Victim Advocate for victim services programs.(2) Twenty-five percent to the board for supervision of offenders under section 6137(a)(3)(ii) and (iii).(3) Fifty percent to the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency to provide grants for victim services programs and reentry services.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "fund" means the Life with Parole Reinvestment Fund.Section 4. Section 6137(a)(1) and (3) of Title 61 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--(1) The board may parole subject to consideration of guidelines established under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154.5 (relating to adoption of guidelines for parole) or subject to section 6137.1 (relating to short sentence parole) and such information developed by or furnished to the board under section 6174 (relating to right of access to offenders), or both, and may release on parole any offender to whom the power to parole is granted to the board by this chapter, except an offender condemned to death [or serving life imprisonment], whenever in its opinion:(i) The best interests of the offender justify or require that the offender be paroled.(ii) It does not appear that the interests of the Commonwealth will be injured by the offender's parole.* * *(3) The power to parole granted under this section to 20250SB0135PN0135 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after[, the]:(i) The expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in its sentence or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation.(ii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757 (relating to consecutive sentences of total confinement for multiple offenses) and except for an offender sentenced to life imprisonment under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711 (relating to sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree ), 25 years after the date of incarceration which, in the case of an offender sentenced to life imprisonment, shall include any period of uninterrupted incarceration occurring prior to trial.(iii) Except as provided under paragraph (6) and notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, 35 years after the date of incarceration which, in the case of an offender sentenced to life imprisonment under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9711, shall include any period of uninterrupted incarceration occurring prior to trial.(iv) Except as provided under paragraph (6), 35 years in the case of an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(a)(1) (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer).(v) Except as provided under paragraph (6) and notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, 25 years in the case of an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(a)(2).(vi) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, 25 years in 20250SB0135PN0135 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the case of an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(1).(vii) Notwithstanding 42 Pa.C.S. § 9757, 20 years in the case of an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(c)(2).* * *(6) The board may not consider or grant parole to any offender convicted of murdering a law enforcement officer of the first degree and sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102(a) (relating to sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer).* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0135PN0135 - 7 - 12345678910111213